Maryland, session 2026, HB0526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 11A. PAYMENT OF SETTLEMENT AGREEMENTS.
5–11A–01.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “IOLTA ACCOUNT” MEANS AN ATTORNEY TRUST ACCOUNT
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–303 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS
ARTICLE.
5–11A–02.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0526*

HOUSE BILL 526
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO ENSURE THE PROMPT EXCHANGE
OF RELEASE DOCUMENTS AND PAYMENT OF SETTLEMENT PROCEEDS FOLLOWING
THE ORAL OR WRITTEN CONFIRMATION OF SETTLEMENT.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A TORT CLAIM FOR MONEY
DAMAGES.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL PAYING FOR A
SETTLEMENT WITH PERSONAL ASSETS.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A SETTLING
DEFENDANT SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A PROPOSED RELEASE TO A PLAINTIFF WITHIN 10
DAYS AFTER AN ORAL OR WRITTEN AGREEMENT FOR A SPECIFIED AMOUNT OF
MONEY TO RESOLVE A CLAIM BEFORE TRIAL; AND
(II) PAY ALL SUMS DUE TO THE PLAINTIFF WITHIN 15 DAYS
AFTER:
1. THE PLAINTIFF PROVIDES THE EXECUTED RELEASE
AND ANY APPLICABLE DOCUMENT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION; OR
2. IF COURT APPROVAL IS REQUIRED BY LAW OR AS
PART OF THE SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT, COURT APPROVAL OF THE SETTLEMENT
AGREEMENT.
(2) DURING A TIME PERIOD DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE PARTIES MAY MUTUALLY AGREE TO AN EXTENSION OF THE TIME
PERIOD.
(D) IF THERE IS A KNOWN AND ASSERTED THIRD–PARTY RIGHT OF
RECOVERY OR SUBROGATION INTEREST, INCLUDING AN ATTORNEY’S LIEN, A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER LIEN, OR A RIGHT OF RECOVERY ASSERTED BY MEDICARE,
THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES, MARYLAND MEDICAID,
OR A PRIVATE HEALTH INSURANCE COMPANY, A PLAINTIFF MAY PROTECT THE
THIRD PARTY’S RIGHT OF RECOVERY OR SUBROGATION INTEREST BY TENDERING
TO A SETTLING DEFENDANT:
(1) FOR AN ATTORNEY’S LIEN, A SIGNED RELEASE OF THE
ATTORNEY’S LIEN;

HOUSE BILL 526 3
(2) FOR A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER LIEN:
(I) A SIGNED RELEASE OF THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER LIEN;
(II) A LETTER FROM THE PLAINTIFF’S ATTORNEY OR LANGUAGE
IN A MUTUALLY AGREED ON RELEASE STATING THAT THE PLAINTIFF’S ATTORNEY
WILL HOLD THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE CLAIMED LIEN IN THE IOLTA ACCOUNT OF
THE PLAINTIFF’S ATTORNEY PENDING FINAL RESOLUTION OF THE LIEN AMOUNT; OR
(III) DOCUMENTATION OF ANY OTHER METHOD OF RESOLUTION
OF THE LIEN OR RIGHT OF RECOVERY AS AGREED TO BY THE PARTIES; OR
(3) FOR A RIGHT OF RECOVERY CLAIMED BY A HEALTH INSURER:
(I) DOCUMENTATION OF AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE
PLAINTIFF AND MEDICARE, THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID
SERVICES, MARYLAND MEDICAID, OR PRIVATE HEALTH INSURANCE COMPANY
REGARDING THE AMOUNT OF THE SETTLEMENT THAT WILL BE ACCEPTED IN
SATISFACTION OF THE RIGHT OF RECOVERY;
(II) A LETTER FROM THE PLAINTIFF’S ATTORNEY, OR
LANGUAGE IN A MUTUAL RELEASE, AGREEING TO HOLD THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE
CLAIMED RIGHT TO RECOVERY IN THE PLAINTIFF’S IOLTA ACCOUNT PENDING
FINAL RESOLUTION OF THE AMOUNT OF THE RIGHT TO RECOVERY; OR
(III) DOCUMENTATION OF ANY OTHER METHOD OF RESOLUTION
OF THE LIEN AS AGREED TO BY THE PARTIES.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
SETTLEMENT AMOUNT SHALL ACCRUE INTEREST AT THE LEGAL RATE OF INTEREST
ON A JUDGMENT, ASSESSED BEGINNING THE DATE THE PARTIES REACH AN ORAL OR
WRITTEN SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT, AND UNTIL PAYMENT IS MADE IF:
(I) THE SETTLING DEFENDANT DOES NOT PROVIDE A DRAFT
RELEASE AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1)(I) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) THE SETTLING DEFENDANT DOES NOT PAY ALL SUMS DUE
AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE PARTIES MAY MUTUALLY AGREE TO AN INTEREST RATE
DIFFERENT THAN THE INTEREST RATE DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, BUT AN AGREEMENT MAY NOT WAIVE THE ACCRUAL OF INTEREST.

HOUSE BILL 526
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any settlement agreement ratified before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.